Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 5101.
Purpose and effect.

In order to safeguard the life and health of the people of this State, a person shall not practice or offer to practice pollution abatement facility operation unless currently licensed under this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“License” means a current authorization granted by the Director permitting the practice of pollution abatement facility operation.

“Permit,” when used as a noun, means an authorization by the Agency of Natural Resources to operate a facility regulated under

10 V.S.A. § 1263

.

“Practice of pollution abatement facility operation” means the operation and maintenance of a facility regulated under

10 V.S.A. § 1263

by a person required by the terms of a permit to hold particular credentials, including those of an “operator,” “assistant chief operator,” or “chief operator.”

“Pollution abatement facility operator” means a person who is licensed under this chapter, or pursuant to rules developed pursuant to this chapter, to engage in the practice of pollution abatement facility operation consistent with a permit.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5103.
Prohibitions; offenses.

It shall be a violation of this chapter for any person, including any corporation, association, or individual, to:

sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any pollution abatement facility operation degree, diploma, certificate of registration, license, or any other related document or record or to aid or abet therein;

practice or knowingly permit the practice of pollution abatement facility operation under cover of any degree, diploma, registration, license, or related document or record illegally or fraudulently obtained or signed or issued unlawfully or under fraudulent representation;

practice or permit the practice of pollution abatement facility operation other than by a person duly registered and currently licensed or otherwise authorized to do so under the provisions of this chapter;

represent himself or herself as being licensed or otherwise authorized by this State to practice pollution abatement facility operation or use in connection with a name any words, letters, signs, or figures that imply that a person is a pollution abatement facility operator when not licensed or otherwise authorized under this chapter;

practice pollution abatement facility operation during the time a license or authorization issued under this chapter is suspended or revoked; or

employ an unlicensed or unauthorized person to practice as a pollution abatement facility operator.

Any person violating this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127(c)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.

§ 5104.
Exceptions.

This chapter does not prohibit:

the furnishing of assistance in the case of an emergency or disaster; or

a person not licensed under this chapter from working under the direct or indirect supervision of a pollution abatement facility operator, where such employment is consistent with the terms, conditions, and intent of a facility’s permit.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 156

(Adj. Sess.), § 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2017.